District of Columbia statutes.
28-5001

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Assist in the transmission” means actions taken by a person to procure, enable, finance, or otherwise actively support the transmission of a commercial electronic mail message by another person, if the person or entity providing the assistance knows or should have known that the initiator of the commercial electronic mail message is engaged, or intends to engage, in any practice that violates this chapter. The term “assist in the transmission” shall not include activities of any person or entity related to the design, manufacture, or distribution of any technology, product, or component that has a commercially significant use other than to violate or circumvent this chapter.

(2)

“Commercial electronic mail message” means an electronic mail message sent for the purpose of encouraging the purchase, rental of, or investment in, property, goods, intangibles, or services.

(3)

“Electronic mail” means an electronic message or computer file containing an image of a message that is transmitted between 2 or more computers, electronic terminals, or cellular telephones, and includes electronic messages that are transmitted within or between computer networks.

(4)

“Electronic mail service provider” means any entity that is an intermediary in sending or receiving electronic mail or that provides to end-users of electronic mail services the ability to send or receive electronic mail.

(5)

“Header information” means the source, destination, and routing information attached to an electronic mail message, including the originating domain name and originating electronic mail address, and any other information that appears in the line identifying, or purporting to identify, a person initiating the message.

Sept. 11, 2008, D.C. Law 17-230, § 2, 55 DCR 8311
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, §§ 245(b), (e), 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-353 validated previously made technical corrections in the section designation, the introductory language, and par. (1).